Massachusetts, session 194th, H3822.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (h1/2) the following paragraph:-
(h ¾) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or any other general or special law,
rule, or regulation to the contrary, a member in service of a retirement system as defined in
section 1 or a retired member who is a veteran who was honorably discharged from the armed
forces of the United States shall have: (i) 1 additional calendar year added to the veteran's age for
the purposes of pension computation; and (ii) 2 additional calendar years added to the veteran's
age for the purposes of pension computation if they have a service connected disability rating of
10 per cent or more from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
of 1